apertium-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%' SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%'%{i%}nc%{I%} CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%'%{I%}nc%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%'%{I%}nc%{i%} SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<abstr%>:%'l%{I%}k # ;

!%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{A%}у SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>:% %% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:% %% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%' SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:% %%%' SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR


!°С%<num%>:°С # ;
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
!°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! Measurement units

km:km SQRD ;
mm:mm SQRD ;
sm:sm SQRD ;
m:m SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{ь%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bir"
2:2%{ь%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "iki"
3:3%{ö%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "üç"
4:4%{ö%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dört"
5:5%{ь%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "beş"
6:6%{ı%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altı"
7:7%{ь%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yedi"
8:8%{ь%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "sekiz"
9:9%{o%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dokuz"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{o%}%{b%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "on"
2%0:2%0%{ь%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yirmi"
3%0:3%0%{o%}%{b%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "otuz"
4%0:4%0%{ı%}%{p%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "kırk"
5%0:5%0%{ь%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "elli"
6%0:6%0%{ı%}%{p%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altmış"
7%0:7%0%{ь%}%{p%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yetmiş"
8%0:8%0%{ь%}%{b%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "seksen"
9%0:9%0%{ı%}%{b%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "doksan"

LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0%{ö%}%{b%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yüz"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{ь%}%{b%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bin"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!       N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!
!! JNW's rewrite of verb morphology
!!!!!!

LEXICON V-AR-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DERIV-AR ; 

LEXICON V-AR-IV 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DERIV-AR ;

LEXICON V-IR-IV 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DERIV-IR ;

LEXICON V-IR-TV 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DERIV-IR ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-AR
!! FIXME: <pass>, <caus>, <rec>
%<coop%>:%>%{i%}ş V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<iver%>:%>%{y%}%{i%}ver V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<eyaz%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}yaz V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;  ! FIXME
%<caus%>:%>t V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;            ! FIXME Dir/LR
%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r%>%{i%}%{L%} V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
V-DERIV-AR-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-AR-COMMON
V-FIN-AR ;
V-NONFIN-AR ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-IR
!! FIXME: <pass>, <caus>, <rec>
%<coop%>:%>%{i%}ş V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<iver%>:%>%{y%}%{i%}ver V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<eyaz%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}yaz V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;  ! FIXME
%<caus%>:%>t V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;            ! FIXME Dir/LR
%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r%>%{i%}%{L%} V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;
V-DERIV-IR-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-DERIV-IR-COMMON
V-FIN-IR ;
V-NONFIN-IR ;

!→!LEXICON V-GERUNDS-COMMON
!→!
!→!N-INFL-COMMON ; 


LEXICON V-GERUNDS

%<ger%>:%>m%{A%} GER-SUBST ; 
%<ger_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k%{v%} GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}ş GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}غ%{v%} GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_inf%>:%>m%{A%}k%{v%} GER-SUBST ;  
%<ger_pabs%>:%>m%{I%}ş GER-SUBST ;

LEXICON V-GERUNDS-AOR-AR

%<ger_aor%>:%>%{A%}r GER-SUBST ; ! was: SUBST

LEXICON V-GERUNDS-AOR-IR

%<ger_aor%>:%>%{i%}r GER-SUBST ; ! was: SUBST

LEXICON V-NONFIN-IR

V-NONFIN-COMMON ;
%<neg%>:m%{A%} V-NONFIN-COMMON ;
V-GERUNDS-AOR-IR ;
V-AOR-NONFIN-IR ;

LEXICON V-NONFIN-AR

V-NONFIN-COMMON ;
%<neg%>:m%{A%} V-NONFIN-COMMON ;
V-GERUNDS-AOR-AR ;
V-AOR-NONFIN-AR ;


LEXICON V-NONFIN-COMMON

!V-INF ;
V-GPR ;
V-GNA ;
V-PRC ;
V-GERUNDS ;
!IMPERATIVE ;

!LEXICON V-INF
!
!%<inf%>:%>m%{A%}k # ;
!%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>m%{A%}%>m%{A%}k # ;

LEXICON V-PRC

%<prc%>:%>m%{A%}k V-PRC-COMMON ;
%<neg%>%<prc%>:%>m%{A%}%>m%{A%}k V-PRC-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-AOR-NONFIN-AR

%<gpr_aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-GPR-COMMON ;
%<gpr_aor%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}z V-GPR-COMMON ;
!%<prc_aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PRC-COMMON ;
%<gna_aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-GNA-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-AOR-NONFIN-IR

%<gpr_aor%>:%>%{i%}r V-GPR-COMMON ;
%<gpr_aor%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}z V-GPR-COMMON ;
!%<prc_aor%>:%>%{i%}r V-PRC-COMMON ;
%<gna_aor%>:%>%{i%}r V-GNA-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-PRC-COMMON
CLIT-NOPERS ;

LEXICON V-GNA-COMMON

CLIT-NOPERS ;

LEXICON V-GPR
!! Verbal adjectives

%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n V-GPR-COMMON ;
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k%{v%} V-GPR-DIK-COMMON ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}c%{I%} # ; 
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k%{v%} V-GPR-DIK-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-GPR-DIK-COMMON 

V-GPR-COMMON ;
V-GPR-DIK-PERS ;

LEXICON V-GPR-DIK-PERS

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n # ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON V-GPR-COMMON

ATTR ;
%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON V-GNA-ABIL
%<gna_neg%>:%>m%{A%}d%{A%}n # ;

LEXICON V-GNA-ABIL-NEG
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna_when%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}nc%{A%} # ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;

LEXICON V-GNA
!! Verbal adverbs

%<gna_impf%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;
%<gna_neg%>:%>m%{A%}d%{A%}n # ;
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna_when%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}nc%{A%} # ;

LEXICON V-FIN-AR

V-AOR-AR ;
V-TENSE-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-FIN-IR

V-AOR-IR ;
V-TENSE-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-AOR-IR
%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
V-AOR-NEG ;

LEXICON V-AOR-AR
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
V-AOR-NEG ;

LEXICON V-AOR-NEG
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}%{z%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;

LEXICON V-TENSE-COMMON

V-TENSE-MA ;
V-TENSE-ABIL ;

LEXICON V-TENSE-MA

V-TENSE-MA-COMMON ;
V-TENSE-MA-NEG ;

LEXICON V-TENSE-MA-NEG

%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} V-TENSE-MA-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TENSE-MA-COMMON

V-IFI-COND ;
V-PROG ;
V-FUT ;
V-NEC ;
V-POT ;
V-PAST ;
V-IMP ;

LEXICON V-IFI-COND

V-IFI ;
V-COND ;

LEXICON V-PROG

%<prog%>:%>%{I%}yor V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
!%<prog_inf%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;

LEXICON V-FUT

%<fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k%{v%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;

LEXICON V-NEC

%<nec%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;


LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL

%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} V-GNA-ABIL ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} V-GNA-ABIL-NEG ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil V-TENSE-ABIL-AFF ;
%<pot%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil V-TENSE-ABIL-AFF ;
%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} V-TENSE-ABIL-NEG ;
%<pot%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}y%{A%}bil V-TENSE-ABIL-AFF ;

LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL-NEG

V-TENSE-MA-COMMON ;
%<aor%>:%{z%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
V-GERUNDS ;


LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL-AFF

V-TENSE-MA-COMMON ;
%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
V-GERUNDS ;



!LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL-AOR-NEG-PERS
!
!%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:z%>s%{I%}n  COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:z%> COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:z%>%{D%}%{I%}r  COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}z  COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:z%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  COPULA-MIMIS ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:z%>l%{A%}r  COPULA-MIMIS ;

LEXICON Verbs
seslendiril:seslendiril V-IR-IV ; !
esir% düş:esir% düş V-IR-IV ; !
eziyet% et:eziyet% et V-AR-TV ; !
hesap% sor:hesap% sor V-AR-IV ; !
deşil:deşil V-IR-IV ; !
alıver:alıver V-IR-TV ; !
ilan% et:ilan% et V-AR-TV ; !
zora% düşürül:zora% düşürül V-IR-IV ; !
kahkaha% at:kahkaha% at V-AR-IV ; !
uzat:uzat V-IR-TV ;!"" Use/MT
çarpış:çarpış V-IR-IV ;
mecbur% ol:mecbur% ol V-IR-IV ;
yoğunla:yoğunla V-IR-TV ; !Use/MT
iyileş:iyileş V-IR-IV ;
sadeleş:sadeleş V-IR-IV ;
evhamlan:evhamlan V-IR-IV ;
ne%<prn%>%<itg%>%+yap%<v%>%<tv%>:nap V-DERIV-AR ; ! "make, do" ! Use/Coll
hamd% et:hamd% et%{v%}  V-AR-IV ; ! "thank" (DIR)
ilhak% et:ilhak% et%{v%}  V-AR-TV ; ! "annex" (DIR)
kır:kır V-AR-TV ; ! "break" (DIR)
lağvet:lağvet V-AR-TV ; ! "proscribe" (DIR)
öngör:öngör V-IR-TV ; ! "set forth" (DIR)
öv:öv V-AR-TV ; ! "praise" (DIR)
sav:sav V-AR-TV ; ! "ward off" (DIR)
sik:sik V-AR-TV ; ! "fuck" (DIR)
sun:sun V-AR-TV ; ! "compere" (DIR)
terket:terket V-AR-TV ; ! "leave" (DIR)
varsay:varsay V-AR-TV ; ! "assume" (DIR)
yırt:yırt V-AR-TV ; ! "tear" (DIR)
affet:affet%{v%} V-AR-TV ; ! "forgive" (DIR)
ayrış:ayrış V-IR-IV ; ! "decompose" (DIR)
bahset:bahset V-AR-TV ; ! "talk about" (DIR)
becer:becer V-IR-TV ; ! "accomplish" (DIR)
bin:bin V-AR-IV ; ! "mount, ride" (DIR) ! With Dative
böl:böl V-AR-TV ; ! "divide" (DIR)
cezbet:cezbet V-AR-TV ; ! "attract" (DIR)
del:del V-AR-TV ; ! "drill" (DIR)
döv:döv V-AR-TV ; ! "hit" (DIR)
endişelen:endişelen V-IR-TV ; ! "worry about" (DIR)
ez:ez V-AR-TV ; ! "crush" (DIR)
gücen:gücen V-IR-IV ; ! "be hurt" (DIR)
güt:güt V-AR-TV ; ! "shepherd" (DIR)
iç:iç V-AR-TV ; ! "drink" (DIR)
kastet:kastet V-AR-TV ; ! "aim at" (DIR)
aş:aş V-AR-TV ; ! "go beyond / exaggerate" (IR)
ada:ada V-IR-TV ; ! "dedicate" (T)
demetle:demetle V-IR-TV ; ! "sheave" (T)
dişle:dişle V-IR-TV ; ! "dent" (T)
kemir:kemir V-IR-TV ; ! "nibble" (T)
kurtar:kurtar V-IR-TV ; ! "rescue" (T)
oyala:oyala V-IR-TV ; ! "put off" (T)
öze:öze V-AR-IV ; ! "be wordy" (T)
şartla:şartla V-IR-TV ; ! "condition" (T)
sula:sula V-IR-TV ; ! "water" (T)
tütsüle:tütsüle V-IR-TV ; ! "kipper" (T)
yenile:yenile V-IR-TV ; ! "renew" (T)
belle:belle V-IR-TV ; ! "memorise" (T)
dene:dene V-IR-TV ; ! "try" (T)
deliye% dön:deliye% dön V-IR-IV ;
etiketle:etiketle V-IR-TV ; ! "tag" (T)
genişle:genişle V-AR-IV ; ! "expand" (T)
hırpala:hırpala V-IR-TV ; ! "beat" (T)
kazı:kazı V-IR-TV ; ! "scrape" (T)
yat:yat V-AR-IV ; ! "lie up" (DIR)
manevra% yap:manevra% yap V-AR-IV ; ! "manoeuver" (DIR)
şaş:şaş V-AR-IV ; ! "amaze" (DIR)
şekillen:şekillen V-IR-IV ; ! "take shape-form" (DIR)
sön:sön V-AR-IV ; ! "be deflated" (DIR)
üş:üş V-AR-IV ; ! "concentrate at somewhere" (DIR)
uyuş:uyuş V-IR-IV ; ! "run in with" (DIR)
zulmet:zulmet V-AR-IV ; ! "oppress" (DIR)
aldan:aldan V-IR-IV ; ! "be deceived, tricked" (DIR)
cay:cay V-AR-IV ; ! "retract" (DIR)
cesaretlen:cesaretlen V-IR-IV ; ! "take courage" (DIR)
dürt:dürt V-AR-IV ; ! "poke" (DIR)
gir:gir V-AR-TV ; ! "enter" (DIR)
görün:görün V-IR-IV ; ! "appear" (DIR)
incel:incel V-AR-IV ; ! "get thinner" (DIR)
kaynaş:kaynaş V-IR-IV ; ! "teem" (DIR)
taş:taş V-AR-IV ; ! "run over" (IR)
konakla:konakla V-AR-IV ; ! "stop over" (T)
patla:patla V-AR-IV ; ! "explode" (T)
sıçra:sıçra V-AR-IV ; ! "bound" (T)
uğra:uğra V-AR-IV ; ! "make a brief visit to" (T)
resmileştir:resmileştir V-IR-TV ;
yanıl:yanıl V-IR-IV ; ! "be mistaken" (T)
yavaşla:yavaşla V-AR-IV ; ! "slow down" (T)
ağna:ağna V-AR-IV ; ! "wallow" (T)
eğle:eğle V-AR-IV ; ! "delay" (T)
hortla:hortla V-AR-IV ; ! "rise from the dead" (T)
mükemmelleştir:mükemmelleştir V-IR-TV ; ! ""
edil:edil V-IR-IV ;
bakış% at:bakış% at V-AR-TV ; ! "glance at / look at [suddenly]"
ruslaştır:ruslaştır V-IR-TV ;
şaşırt:şaşırt V-IR-TV ;
rağbet% et:rağbet% et V-AR-IV ; 
emil:emil V-IR-IV ;
hasıl% ol:hasıl% ol V-IR-IV ; !
tekit% et:tekit% et V-AR-TV ; !
titret:titret V-IR-TV ; !
teşkil% et:teşkil% et V-IR-IV ; !
temin% et:temin% et V-AR-TV ; !
dövül:dövül V-IR-IV ; ! Use/MT
yaşan:yaşan V-IR-IV ;
giderek% art:giderek% art V-AR-IV ;
bağırış:bağırış V-IR-IV ;
çalış:çalış V-IR-TV ; ! "try"?
